Maine, session 132, LD642.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §10912 is enacted to read:
§10912. Priority for parents or pregnant individuals to register for courses
The trustees shall ensure that a parent or pregnant individual who is enrolled at the
university receives priority in registering for courses for the purpose of scheduling the
courses around the parent's child care. The trustees shall distribute flyers and posters
informing students of the right of parents and pregnant individuals to priority registration
for courses. The posters must be displayed in appropriate places at each campus of the
university and on the publicly accessible website of each campus of the university.